Louisiana, session 2026, HB1032.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:414(A)(1)(a), (B)(2)(a), (D)(1)(a), (I)(1), and (V), 661(A)(3),
896(A), and 1420 are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§414. Suspension, revocation, renewal, and cancellation of licenses; judicial review
A.(1)(a) The department shall suspend the license of any person for a period
of twelve months upon receiving, from any district, city, or municipal court, of this
state or of any other state, having traffic jurisdiction, or from any federal court or
magistrate having traffic jurisdiction, satisfactory evidence of the conviction or of
the entry of a plea of guilty or nolo contendere and sentence thereupon or of the
forfeiture of bail of any such person charged with the first offense for vehicular
negligent injuring, R.S. 14:39.1, or for operating a motor vehicle while under the
influence of beverages of high alcoholic content, of low alcoholic content, of
narcotic drugs, or of central nervous system stimulants any drug, combination of
drugs, or combination of alcohol and drugs, including those cases where a person's
sentence is suspended pursuant to Code of Criminal Procedure Article 893 or 894.
The department shall promptly investigate an allegation made by such licensee that
the suspension of his driving privileges will deprive him or his family of the
necessities of life, or will prevent him from earning a livelihood. If the department
so finds, it may reinstate the license of such licensee; however, such suspension and
reinstatement shall be considered as a first suspension and grant of restricted driving
Page 1 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1032 ENROLLED
privileges for the purposes of R.S. 32:415.1, and the driving privileges of the
licensee shall be restricted as provided in R.S. 32:415.1 for a period of twelve
months from the date of conviction or the entry of a plea of guilty or nolo contendere
and sentence thereupon or of the forfeiture of bail. Notice of the restriction shall be
attached to the license.
* * *
B. The department shall forthwith suspend the license of any person, for a
period of twenty-four months, upon receiving satisfactory evidence of the conviction
or of the entry of a plea of guilty and sentence thereupon or of the forfeiture of bail
of any such person charged with any of the following crimes:
* * *
(2)(a) Conviction or the entry of a plea of guilty and sentence thereupon, or
of the forfeiture of bail of any such person on the second offense for vehicular
negligent injuring or for operating or being in actual physical control of a motor
vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating beverages, of central nervous
system stimulants or depressants, or of narcotic drugs or any other drug or substance
to a degree which renders him incapable of safely operating a motor vehicle any
drug, combination of drugs, or combination of alcohol and drugs, when any or all of
the offenses were the result of violations of a state law, a municipal ordinance, a
federal law, or any combination of them; however, any offense for vehicular
negligent injuring or for operating or being in actual physical control of a motor
vehicle while under the influence of alcoholic beverages which was committed more
than ten years prior to the commission of a subsequent such offense of operating or
being in actual physical control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of
alcoholic beverages shall not be considered in determining the number of such
offenses of operating or controlling a motor vehicle while under the influence of
alcoholic beverages which the person has committed.
* * *
D.(1)(a) The department shall suspend the license of any person for a period
of thirty-six months upon receiving satisfactory evidence of conviction, plea of
Page 2 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1032 ENROLLED
guilty, or plea of nolo contendere, and sentence thereon, or of the forfeiture of bail
of any such person as determined by any court of jurisdiction as set forth in this
Section, with regard to a third or subsequent offense for vehicular negligent injuring
or for operating a motor vehicle while under the influence of beverages of alcoholic
content, of narcotic drugs, or of central nervous system stimulants any drug,
combination of drugs, or combination of alcohol and drugs. Third or subsequent
offenses for purposes of this Subsection does not refer to the criminal charge but
rather to the number of offenses resulting in conviction, guilty pleas, nolo contendere
pleas, or bond forfeitures within five years from date of first offense to the date of
third offense.
* * *
I.(1) The reinstatement fee for a license of a person who has been convicted
of or forfeited bond on or entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to a charge of
operating a motor vehicle while under the influence of beverages of high alcoholic
content, of low alcoholic content, of narcotic drugs, or of central nervous system
stimulants any drugs, combination of drugs, or combination of alcohol and drugs
shall be one hundred dollars if one conviction appears listed on his record prior to
application for reinstatement; two hundred dollars if two such convictions appear on
his record prior to application for reinstatement; and three hundred dollars for each
conviction on his record after the second conviction prior to application for
reinstatement, and the requirements of R.S. 32:896 relative to proof of financial
responsibility have been satisfied.
* * *
V.(1) The department shall suspend the license of a person for the same
period of time as provided in Subparagraphs (A)(1)(a), (B)(2)(a), and (D)(1)(a) of
this Section for the conviction or the entry of a plea of guilty and sentence thereupon,
or the forfeiture of bail of any such person charged with vehicular negligent injuring
committed while operating a watercraft or for operating a watercraft while under the
influence of beverages of high alcoholic content, of low alcoholic content, of
Page 3 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1032 ENROLLED
narcotic drugs, or of central nervous system stimulants any drugs, combination of
drugs, or combination of alcohol and drugs.
(2) Any suspension or revocation of license due to the conviction or the entry
of a plea of guilty or nolo contendere and sentence thereupon or the forfeiture of bail
on the charge of vehicular negligent injuring or for operating a motor vehicle while
under the influence of beverages of high alcoholic content, of low alcoholic content,
of narcotic drugs, or of central nervous system stimulants any drugs, combination of
drugs, or combination of alcohol and drugs as provided for in this Section shall also
prohibit the operation or physical control of a watercraft upon the waterways of this
state during the time period of such suspension or revocation.
* * *
§661. Operating a vehicle under the influence of alcoholic beverages or illegal
substance or controlled dangerous substances; implied consent to chemical
tests; administering of test and presumptions
A.
* * *
(3) If the person is under twenty-one years of age, the test or tests shall be
administered at the direction of a law enforcement officer having reasonable grounds
to believe the person to have been driving or in actual physical control of a motor
vehicle upon the public highways of this state after having consumed alcoholic
beverages, any drug, combination of drugs, or combination of alcohol and drugs.
The law enforcement agency by which the officer is employed shall designate in
writing and under what conditions which of the tests shall be administered.
* * *
§896. Proof required upon certain convictions
A. When the director under Section 414(A) R.S. 32:414(A) or (B)(2) or
414(B)(2) of this Title suspends the license or nonresident operating privilege of any
person upon receipt of evidence of conviction, entry of guilty plea, or forfeiture of
bond of any person charged with operating a motor vehicle while under the influence
of intoxicating beverages, or narcotic drugs or stimulants of the central nervous
Page 4 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1032 ENROLLED
system any drugs, combination of drugs, or combination of alcohol and drugs, or
under Section 667 of this Title R.S. 32:667 for refusal to submit to chemical tests of
blood, breath, urine, or other bodily substance for determining the alcoholic content
of his blood, no license shall be reinstated or reissued to the person unless such
person previously has given or immediately gives and thereafter maintains proof of
financial responsibility with respect to all motor vehicles registered by him and shall
show financial responsibility individually as a non-owner for a period of three years.
* * *
§1420. Enactment; text
The Driver License Compact is hereby enacted into law and entered into with
all other jurisdictions legally joining therein in the form substantially as follows:
DRIVER LICENSE COMPACT
ARTICLE I
Findings and declaration of policy
(a) The party states find that:
(1) The safety of their streets and highways is materially affected by the
degree of compliance with state and local ordinances relating to the operation of
motor vehicles.
(2) Violation of such a law or ordinance is evidence that the violator engages
in conduct which is likely to endanger the safety of persons and property.
(3) The continuance in force of a license to drive is predicated upon
compliance with laws and ordinances relating to the operation of motor vehicles, in
whichever jurisdiction the vehicle is operated.
(b) It is the policy of each of the party states to:
(1) Promote compliance with the laws, ordinances, and administrative rules
and regulations relating to the operation of motor vehicles by their operators in each
of the jurisdictions where such operators drive motor vehicles.
(2) Make the reciprocal recognition of licenses to drive and eligibility
therefor more just and equitable by considering the overall compliance with motor
vehicle laws, ordinances and administrative rules and regulations as a condition
Page 5 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1032 ENROLLED
precedent to the continuance or issuance of any license by reason of which the
licensee is authorized or permitted to operate a motor vehicle in any of the party
states.
ARTICLE II
Definitions
As used in this compact:
(a) "State" means a state, territory or possession of the United States, the
District of Columbia, or the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico.
(b) "Home state" means the state which has issued and has the power to
suspend or revoke the use of the license or permit to operate a motor vehicle.
(c) "Conviction" means a conviction of any offense related to the use or
operation of a motor vehicle which is prohibited by state law, municipal ordinance
or administrative rule or regulation, or a forfeiture of bail, bond or other security
deposited to secure appearance by a person charged with having committed any such
offense, and which conviction or forfeiture is required to be reported to the licensing
authority.
ARTICLE III
Reports of conviction
The licensing authority of a party state shall report each conviction of a
person from another party state occurring within its jurisdiction to the licensing
authority of the home state of the licensee. Such report shall clearly identify the
person convicted; describe the violation specifying the section of the statute, code
or ordinance violated; identify the court in which action was taken; indicate whether
a plea of guilty or not guilty was entered, or the conviction was a result of the
forfeiture of bail, bond or other security; and shall include any special findings made
in connection therewith.
ARTICLE IV
Effect of conviction
(a) The licensing authority in the home state, for the purposes of suspension,
revocation or limitation of the license to operate a motor vehicle, shall give the same
Page 6 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1032 ENROLLED
effect to the conduct reported, pursuant to Article III of this compact, as it would if
such conduct had occurred in the home state, in the case of convictions for:
(1) Manslaughter or negligent homicide resulting from the operation of a
motor vehicle;
(2) Driving a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor
or a narcotic drug, or a narcotic drug, or under the influence of any other drug any
drug, combination of drugs, or combination of alcohol and drugs ;
(3) Any felony in the commission of which a motor vehicle is used;
(4) Failure to stop and render aid in the event of a motor vehicle accident
resulting in the death or personal injury of another.
(b) As to other convictions, reported pursuant to Article III, the licensing
authority in the home state shall give such effect to the conduct as is provided by the
laws of the home state.
(c) If the laws of a party state do not provide for offenses or violations
denominated or described in precisely the words employed in subdivision (a) of this
Article, such party state shall construe the denominations and descriptions appearing
in subdivision (a) hereof as being applicable to and identifying those offenses or
violations of a substantially similar nature and the laws of such party state shall
contain such provisions as may be necessary to ensure that full force and effect is
given to this Article.
ARTICLE V
Applications for new licenses
Upon application for a license to drive, the licensing authority in a party state
shall ascertain whether the applicant has ever held, or is the holder of a license to
drive issued by any other party state. The licensing authority in the state where
application is made shall not issue a license to drive to the applicant if:
(1) The applicant has held such a license, but the same has been suspended
by reason, in whole or in part, of a violation and if such suspension period has not
terminated.
Page 7 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1032 ENROLLED
(2) The applicant has held such a license, but the same has been revoked by
reason, in whole or in part, of a violation and if such revocation has not terminated,
except that after the expiration of one year from the date the license was revoked,
such person may make application for a new license if permitted by law. The
licensing authority may refuse to issue a license to any such applicant if, after
investigation, the licensing authority determines that it will not be safe to grant to
such person the privilege of driving a motor vehicle on the public highways.
(3) The applicant is the holder of a license to drive issued by another party
state and currently in force unless the applicant surrenders such license.
ARTICLE VI
Applicability of other laws
Except as expressly required by provisions of this compact, nothing
contained herein shall be construed to affect the right of any party state to apply any
of its other laws relating to licenses to drive to any person or circumstance, nor to
invalidate or prevent any driver license agreement or other cooperative arrangement
between a party state and a nonparty state.
ARTICLE VII
Compact administrator and interchange of information
(a) The head of the licensing authority of each party state shall be the
administrator of this compact for his state. The administrators, acting jointly, shall
have the power to formulate all necessary and proper procedures for the exchange
of information under this compact.
(b) The administrator of each party state shall furnish to the administrator of
each other party state any information or documents reasonably necessary to
facilitate the administration of this compact.
ARTICLE VIII
Entry into force and withdrawal
(a) This compact shall enter into force and become effective as to any state
when it has enacted the same into law.
Page 8 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1032 ENROLLED
(b) Any party state may withdraw from this compact by enacting a statute
repealing the same, but no such withdrawal shall take effect until six months after
the executive head of the withdrawing state has given notice of the withdrawal to the
executive heads of all other party states. No withdrawal shall affect the validity or
applicability by the licensing authorities of states remaining party to the compact of
any report of conviction occurring prior to the withdrawal.
ARTICLE IX
Construction and severability
This compact shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes
thereof. The provisions of this compact shall be severable and if any phrase, clause,
sentence or provision of this compact is declared to be contrary to the constitution
of any party state or of the United States or the applicability thereof to any
government, agency, person or circumstance is held invalid, the validity of the
remainder of this compact and the applicability thereof to any government, agency,
person or circumstance shall not be affected thereby. If this compact shall be held
contrary to the constitution of any state party thereto, the compact shall remain in full
force and effect as to the remaining states and in full force and effect as to the state
affected as to all severable matters.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 9 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.